Rhode Island, session 2025, SB570.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-14 of the General Laws entitled "Speed Restrictions" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-14-14. School bus speed limit.
No school bus, as defined in § 31-1-3, shall be operated, on a limited access highway, as
defined in § 31-1-23, at a speed greater than ten miles per hour (10 mph) below the posted speed
limit.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000369
========